Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 32-939 is hereby amended to read as follows: 32-
939. (a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Department lands and waters" means lands, waters and facilities
that are under the jurisdiction and control of the secretary through
ownership, lease, license, cooperative agreement, memorandum of
understanding or other arrangement, including, but not limited to, state
parks, state lakes, recreational grounds, wildlife areas, sanctuaries, fish
hatcheries, natural areas and historic sites;
(2) "migratory waterfowl" means any wild goose, duck or merganser;
and
(3) "nonresident" means any person who has not been a bona fide
resident of this state for the immediately preceding 60 days. "Nonresident"
does not include:
(A) A nonresident lifetime license holder pursuant to K.S.A. 32-930,
and amendments thereto; or
(B) a nonresident entitled to resident licenses, permits, stamps and
other issues as authorized by K.S.A. 32-980, and amendments thereto.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law or rules and regulations
of the secretary and in addition to any other license, permit or stamp
required by law or rules and regulations of the secretary, a valid state
migratory waterfowl habitat stamp is required to hunt any migratory
waterfowl in this state.

SB 213 2
(c)(2) The provisions of subsection (b) paragraph (1) do not apply to
hunting, by legal means, by a person not required by K.S.A. 32-919, and
amendments thereto, to hold a hunting license.
(d)(c) The stamp required by this section is valid throughout the state.
(e)(d) The stamp required by this section is valid from the date of
issuance and expires at 12 midnight on June 30 following its the issuance
of such stamp.
(f)(e) Each migratory waterfowl habitat stamp shall be validated by
the signature of the stamp holder written across the face of such stamp.
(f) The fee for a waterfowl stamp shall be the amount prescribed
pursuant to K.S.A. 32-988, and amendments thereto.
(g) Nonresidents shall not hunt or take migratory waterfowl except
on Sundays, Mondays and Tuesdays during any established hunting
season for migratory waterfowl.
(h) The restriction set forth by subsection (g) shall apply to:
(1) Department lands and waters;
(2) federal lands and waters owned by the United States and
administered by:
(A) The secretary of the army, United States army corps of engineers
at:
(i) The Big Hill, Clinton, Council Grove, El Dorado, Elk City, Fall
River, Hillsdale, John Redmond, Kanopolis, Marion, Melvern, Milford,
Perry, Pomona, Toronto, Tuttle Creek and Wilson reservoirs; and
(ii) Missouri river fish and wildlife mitigation lands, including, but
not limited to, Benedictine Bottoms, Burr Oak, Dalbey, Elwood and Oak
Mills;
(B) the United States department of the interior, bureau of
reclamation at Cedar Bluff, Cheney, Glen Elder, Lovewell, Norton and
Webster reservoirs; and
(C) the United States department of the interior, United States fish
and wildlife service at Flint Hills national wildlife refuge, Quivira
national refuge, Marais Des Cygnes national wildlife refuge and Kirwin
national wildlife refuges.
(i) The restriction set forth by subsection (g) shall not apply to:
(1) Property enrolled and designated as either a walk-in hunting
access area or an interactive walk-in hunting access area;
(2) navigable rivers in Kansas; or
(3) the conservation order for light geese season as provided in 50
C.F.R. § 21.180.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-988 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-988. (a) The secretary is authorized to adopt, in accordance
with K.S.A. 32-805, and amendments thereto, rules and regulations fixing
the amount of fees for the following items, subject to the following

SB 213 3
limitations and subject to the requirement that no such rules and
regulations shall be adopted as temporary rules and regulations:
Big game permits
Resident (other than elk permit): maximum $100
Nonresident (other than elk permit): maximum $400
Elk permit: maximum $350
Nonresident mule deer stamp: maximum $150
Nonresident applications: maximum $25
Combination hunting and fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $50
Lifetime: maximum $1,000; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$150
Nonresident: maximum $200
Commercial dog training permits: maximum $25
Commercial guide permit or associate guide permit
Resident: maximum $250
Nonresident: maximum $1,000
Commercial harvest or dealer permits: maximum $200
Commercial prairie rattlesnake harvesting permits
Resident or nonresident with valid hunting license: maximum $5
Resident or nonresident nonfirearm without valid hunting license:
maximum $20
Controlled shooting area operator license: maximum $400
Duplicate licenses, permits, stamps and other issues of the department:
maximum $10
Falconry
Permits: maximum $300
Examinations: maximum $100
Field trial permits: maximum $25
Fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $25
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident: maximum $75
Five-day nonresident: maximum $25
Institutional group: maximum $200
Special nonprofit group: maximum $200
Twenty-four-hour: maximum $10
Fur dealer licenses
Resident: maximum $200
Nonresident: maximum $400
Furharvester licenses
Resident: maximum $25

SB 213 4
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident: maximum $400
Game breeder permits: maximum $15
Persons with a physical or developmental disability hunting and fishing
permits: maximum $5
Hound trainer-breeder running permits: maximum $25
Hunting licenses
Resident: maximum $25
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident 16 or more years of age: maximum $125
Nonresident under 16 years of age: maximum $75
Controlled shooting area: maximum $25
Forty-eight-hour waterfowl permits: maximum $25
Migratory waterfowl habitat stamps: maximum $8
Mussel fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $200 $20
Nonresident: maximum $1,500 $100
Rabbit permits
Live trapping: maximum $200
Shipping: maximum $400
Raptor propagation permits: maximum $100
Rehabilitation permits: maximum $50
Scientific, educational or exhibition permits: maximum $10
Wildlife damage control permits: maximum $10
Wildlife importation permits: maximum $10
Wild turkey permits
Resident: maximum $100
Nonresident: maximum $400
Resident turkey tag: maximum $20
Nonresident turkey tag: maximum $30
Special permits under K.S.A. 32-961, and amendments thereto: maximum
$100
Miscellaneous fees
Special events on department land or water: maximum $200
Special departmental services, materials or supplies: no maximum
Other issues of department: no maximum
Vendor bond: no maximum

(b) The fee for a landowner-tenant resident big game or wild turkey
hunting permit shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a general resident

big game or wild turkey hunting permit.

SB 213 5
(c) The fee for a big game or wild turkey hunting permit for a resident
under 16 years of age shall be an amount not to exceed 1/ the fee for a

general resident big game or wild turkey hunting permit.
(d) The fee for a furharvester license for a resident under 16 years of
age shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a resident furharvester

license.
(e) For a resident who is at least 65 years of age, but less than 75
years of age:
(1) The fee for an annual hunting license shall be an amount equal to
1/ the fee for a general annual hunting license;

(2) the fee for an annual fishing license shall be an amount equal to 1/

the fee for a general annual fishing license; and
(3) the fee for an annual combination hunting and fishing license
shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a general annual combination

hunting and fishing license.
(f) Any person who is a resident of this state and satisfies the
requirements to be considered a disabled veteran under K.S.A. 2024 Supp.
32-934, and amendments thereto, shall be exempt from the hunting and
fishing license fees listed in subsection (a).
(g) The secretary may establish, by rules and regulations adopted in
accordance with K.S.A. 32-805, and amendments thereto, different fees for
various classes and types of licenses, permits, stamps and other issuances
of the department which may occur within each item as described under
subsection (a).
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 32-939 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-988 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.